Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GRANTS TO RESTORE AND CREATE WETLANDS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for a cost-sharing program that provides assistance to landowners for restoring and creating sustainable wetlands that are eligible for wetland banking under the Wetland Conservation Act under Minnesota Statutes, sections 103G.222 and 103G.2251. The following activities are eligible for grants: new text end new text begin (1) site assessment and evaluation; new text end new text begin (2) engineering design and construction, including rerouting or removing drainage systems; new text end new text begin (3) establishing vegetation; and new text end new text begin (4) costs associated with establishing long-term easements on the wetland. new text end